Washington statutes.
RCW 43.59.040

Powers and duties of commission.

In addition to other responsibilities set forth in this chapter the commission shall:

(1) Advise and confer with the governing authority of any political subdivision of the state deemed eligible under the federal Highway Safety Act of 1966 (Public Law 89-564; 80 Stat. 731) for participation in the aims and programs and purposes of that act;

(2) Advise and confer with all agencies of state government whose programs and activities are within the scope of the Highway Safety Act including those agencies that are not subject to direct supervision, administration, and control by the governor under existing laws;

(3) Succeed to and be vested with all powers, duties, and jurisdictions previously vested in the Washington state safety council;

(4) Carry out such other responsibilities as may be consistent with this chapter.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 14 s 1; 1967 ex.s. c 147 s 4.]